Hawaii statutes.
§481C-3 Balloon payments. With respect
to any sale of goods purchased primarily for a personal, family or household
purpose, which is subject to the provisions of this chapter, if any scheduled
payment is more than twice as large as the average of earlier scheduled
payments, the buyer has the right to refinance the amount of that payment at
the time it is due without penalty. The terms of the refinancing shall be no
less favorable to the buyer than the terms of the original sale. These
provisions do not apply to the extent that the payment schedule is adjusted to
the seasonal or irregular income of the buyer. [L 1976, c 32, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next